Hawaii statutes.
[§654-4] Examination of defendant.
When it appears by the return of the officer to whom the order was issued that
the property claimed has been disposed of or concealed so that the order cannot
be executed, the court, upon motion and affidavit, may compel the attendance of
the defendant or any other person to examine the defendant or other person on
oath as to the situation of the property, and may punish a wilful hindrance to,
or obstruction or disobedience of, any order of the court as a contempt. [L Sp
1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-24; HRS §654-25; am L 1972, c 90, §1(d); ren
HRS §654-4; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next